North Dakota, session 69, HB1474.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - PROPERTY TAX REFORM FOR
RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY.
1. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall consider studying
property tax reform for residential property, including the feasibility of imposing
limitations on taxable valuation increases and of replacing the current property tax
structure for residential property with a price per square foot taxation method. The
study must include:
a. A review of the current property tax system for residential property, including
procedures for property assessment, the function of the equalization and
abatement process, and the process for determining taxing district budgets.
b. Consideration of methods to limit the growth of residential property values,
including potential advantages and disadvantages for property owners and taxing
districts.
c. Consideration of implementation and administration of a new taxation method
based on a price per square foot, the potential impact of the new taxation method
on taxpayers and taxing districts, potential unintended consequences related to a
transition from the current ad valorem taxation system to a new taxation method,
Page No. 1 25.1184.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
and potential approaches to mitigate unintended consequences related to the
transition to a new taxation method.
2. The legislative management shall report its findings and recommendations, together
with any legislation required to implement the recommendations, to the seventieth
legislative assembly.
Page No. 2 25.1184.02000